Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2,101
Reverter or rights of entry; dissolution of corporation; ceases and determines.

When a corporation is dissolved or ceases to exist, any possibility of reverter and any right of entry or reentry for breach of condition subsequent heretofore or hereafter reserved by or to the corporation and affecting land in this state ceases and determines.

Laws 1959, c. 350, § 3, p. 1237.

This section does not purport to create a new estate nor to expand the existing law on the subject. Cast v. National Bank of Commerce T. & S. Assn., 186 Neb. 385, 183 N.W.2d 485 (1971).